Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 4
RIGHTS OF PERSONS IN CUSTODY

16-3-401. Treatment while in custody.

No unlawful means of any kind shall be used to obtain a statement, admission, or confession from any person in custody.

Persons arrested or in custody shall be treated humanely and provided with adequate food, shelter, and, if required, medical treatment. Anyone receiving medical treatment while held in custody may be assessed a medical treatment charge as provided in section 17-26-104.5, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 202, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-401.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 192, § 2, effective April 1.

16-3-402. Right to communicate with attorney and family.

Persons who are arrested shall have the right to communicate with an attorney of their choice and a member of their family by making a reasonable number of telephone calls or by communicating in any other reasonable manner. Such communication shall be permitted at the earliest possible time after arrival at the police station, sheriff's office, jail, or other like confinement facility to which such person is first taken after arrest.

If the accused is transferred to a new place of custody, his right to communicate with an attorney and a member of his family is renewed.

(2.5) If the victim is able to demonstrate through the use of caller identification or other credible evidence that the incarcerated defendant has called the victim from the jail or correctional facility in violation of the protection order issued pursuant to section 18-1-1001, C.R.S., or in violation of any other valid protection order or emergency protection order in effect, the defendant shall not be entitled to further telephone calls except to such defendant's attorney, which calls shall be placed by a jail or correctional facility staff member. If the defendant was arrested for violating an order not to contact certain family members, the right to contact those family members by telephone shall be prohibited, and the jail or correctional facility staff shall place all outgoing telephone calls that the defendant wishes to make that are not identified in the protection order as prohibited.

Consistent with the provisions of section 21-1-103, C.R.S., if any person in custody indicates in any manner his desire to speak with an attorney or the court determines that an inquiry into the matter of indigency should occur, the public defender shall be permitted to communicate with that person to determine whether that person has counsel and, if the person desires that the public defender represent him, to make an initial determination as to whether the person is indigent. If the public defender determines that the person is indigent, such person shall apply for representation by the public defender in accordance with section 21-1-103, C.R.S.

The public defender, upon his request and with due regard for reasonable law enforcement administrative procedures, shall be permitted to determine whether or not any person in custody has been taken without unnecessary delay before the nearest available county or district judge.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 202, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-402.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 924, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 86:

(3)(a) amended, p. 731, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(3)(a) amended, p. 663, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2.5) added, p. 2035, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2.5) amended, p. 1013, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2.5) amended, p. 1883, § 20, effective August 5.

16-3-403. Right to consult with attorney.

Any person committed, imprisoned, or arrested for any cause, whether or not such person is charged with an offense, shall be allowed to consult with an attorney-at-law of this state whom such person desires to see or consult, alone and in private at the place of custody, as many times and for such period each time as is reasonable. Except where extradition proceedings have been completed or are not required by law, when any such person is about to be moved beyond the limits of this state, the person to be moved shall be entitled to a reasonable delay for the purpose of obtaining counsel and of availing himself of the laws of this state for the security of personal liberty.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 203, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-403.

16-3-404. Duty of officers to admit attorney.

All peace officers or persons having in custody any person committed, imprisoned, or arrested for any alleged cause shall forthwith admit any attorney-at-law in this state, upon the demand of the prisoner or of a friend, relative, spouse, or attorney of the prisoner, to see and consult the person so imprisoned, alone and in private, at the jail or other place of custody, if such person so imprisoned expressly consents to see or to consult with the attorney.

Any peace officer or person violating the duty imposed by this section or section 16-3-403 shall forfeit and pay not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars to the person imprisoned or to his attorney for the benefit of the person imprisoned, to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 203, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-404.

Cross references:

For the crime of official oppression for denial of opportunity to consult an attorney, see § 18-8-403 (1)(b).

16-3-405. Strip searches - when authorized or prohibited.

No person arrested for a traffic or a petty offense shall be strip searched, prior to arraignment, unless there is reasonable belief that the individual is concealing a weapon or a controlled substance or that the individual, upon identification, is a parolee or an offender serving a sentence in any correctional facility in the state or that the individual is arrested for driving while under the influence of drugs.

As used in this section, "strip search" means having an arrested person remove or arrange some or all of his or her clothing so as to permit a visual inspection of the genitals, buttocks, anus, or female breasts of such person.

Any strip search that is conducted shall be performed by a person of the same sex as the arrested person and on premises where the search cannot be observed by persons not physically conducting the search.

Every peace officer or employee of a police department or sheriff's department conducting a strip search shall obtain the written permission of the police commander or an agent thereof or a sheriff or an agent thereof designated for the purposes of authorizing a strip search in accordance with this section.

No search of any body cavity other than the mouth shall be conducted without the written permission of the police commander or an agent thereof or a sheriff or an agent thereof authorizing a body cavity search. The search must be performed under sanitary conditions and conducted by a licensed physician or nurse.

Any peace officer or employee of a police department or a sheriff's department who knowingly or intentionally fails to comply with any provision of this section commits second degree official misconduct, as defined in section 18-8-405, C.R.S. Nothing contained in this section shall preclude prosecution of a peace officer or employee of a police department or sheriff's department under any other provision of the law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the statutory or common-law rights of any person for the purposes of any civil action or injunctive relief.

The provisions of subsections (1) to (6) of this section shall not apply when, following arraignment and pursuant to a court order, the person is taken into custody by or remanded to a sheriff or a correctional facility.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire section added, p. 305, § 1, effective April 5.

Cross references:

For definition of "controlled substance", see § 12-280-402 (1); for "driving under the influence" of any drug, see § 42-4-1301.